Tennessee statutes. Title 25 Judgments
Chapter 1

General Provisions

25-1-101. [Reserved.]

In actions brought on bonds or agreements for the payment of money, or with collateral conditions, and recovery had by the plaintiff, the judgment shall be entered for the stipulated penalty, to be discharged by the payment of the principal and interest due thereon, or the damages assessed by the jury, and execution shall issue accordingly.

Code 1858, § 2976 (deriv. Acts 1801, ch. 6, § 66); Shan., § 4704; Code 1932, § 8834; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 25-104.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Bonds, §§ 16, 22; 15 Tenn. Juris., Insurance, § 131.

25-1-103. Set off of judgments.

Judgments of the same court may be set off against each other on motion, but not so as to defeat liens of attorneys or to circumvent the exemption laws.

Code 1858, § 2925; Shan., § 4646; mod. Code 1932, § 8775; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 25-105.

Cross-References. Setoffs in general, title 20, ch. 6, part 4.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Judgments and Decrees, § 66; 22 Tenn. Juris., Setoff, Recoupment and Counterclaim, § 19.

25-1-104. Several parties.

Judgments may be given for or against one (1) or more of several plaintiffs, or for or against one or more of several defendants. In such case, the verdict shall be as the right may appear, and shall state separately any amount allowed to or against any of the parties.

Code 1858, §§ 2972, 2973 (deriv. Acts 1820, ch. 25, §§ 1, 2; 1851-1852, ch. 152, § 2; 1855-1856, ch. 71, § 1); Shan., §§ 4700, 4701; mod. Code 1932, §§ 8830, 8831; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 25-106.

Cross-References. Permissive joinder of parties, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 20.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Judgments and Decrees, § 13.

25-1-105. Judgment molded to facts.

Such and so many judgments, joint, separate, and cross, may be rendered as may be necessary to the rights of the parties, or one (1) amount may be set off against another and judgment rendered for the residue, or judgment may be rendered for the defendant against the plaintiff for any amount or balance for which it is found that the plaintiff is liable.

Code 1858, § 2974 (deriv. Acts 1855-1856, ch. 71, § 1); Shan., § 4702; Code 1932, § 8832; T.C.A (orig. ed.), § 25-107.

Cross-References. Judgment molded to facts, §20-6-403.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 223.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Forcible Entry and Detainer, § 16; 16 Tenn. Juris., Judgments and Decrees, § 21; 23 Tenn. Juris., Suretyship, § 30.

Law Reviews.

Waiting for the Jury (George W. Jenkins III), 20 No. 4 Tenn. B.J. 31 (1984).

25-1-106. Damages — Spouse's loss of consortium.

There shall exist in cases where such damages are proved by a spouse, a right to recover for loss of consortium.

Acts 1969, ch. 86, § 1; T.C.A., § 25-109.

Law Reviews.

Loss of Consortium — II. Evolution and Present Treatment of the Action for Loss of Consortium (Larry B. Luber), 1 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 107.

Loss of Filial Consortium (John A. Day), 37 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 26 (2001).

Stealing Love in Tennessee: The Thief Goes Free, 56 Tenn. L. Rev. 629 (1989).

To Have and Not Hold: Applying the Discovery Rule to Loss of Consortium Claims Stemming from Premarital Latent Injuries, 53 Vand. L. Rev. 685 (2000).

Tort Law — Loss of Consortium Damages for Spouse and Children, 67 Tenn. L. Rev. 475 (2000).

25-1-107. Address of losing party.

Each final judgment shall contain thereon the address, if known to the prevailing party, of each person against whom judgment is rendered. Errors in names or addresses or failure to include same shall not affect the validity or finality of a final judgment.

Acts 1982, ch. 548, § 1.

25-1-108. Identification information — Collection of court costs.

To aid in the collection of court costs, the security given and any order assessing costs shall include sufficient information regarding the unique identity of the party at whose instance the action is brought or who is taxed with costs. In the case of an individual party or parties, such information may include the social security number, driver license number or other unique identifying number. In the case of a party other than an individual, such information may include the federal employer identification number or other corporate or organizational identifying number. If a surety is given on cost bond by an attorney, the inclusion of the board of professional responsibility number shall be sufficient. Failure to include such numbers shall not affect the validity of the action, surety or order nor shall the failure to include the number delay the issuance of process.

Acts 1998, ch. 692, § 1.

25-1-102. Action on bond or agreement.